District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2507

Employment of unlicensed person prohibited.

Repealed.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 6
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2107.
1973 Ed., § 2-1407.

Prior Codifications